District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.11

Registered agent for service.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 271, Pub. L. 87-569, § 11
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-64, § 3(a), 31 DCR 195
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1604(a), 49 DCR 11664
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.11.
1981 Ed., § 29-511.
1973 Ed., § 29-1011.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1604(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1604(a) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1604(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).